Utah statutes.
41-22-17.   Penalties for violations.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided, a person who violates the provisions of
this chapter is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
(2)  The division may revoke or suspend the registration of any off-highway
vehicle whose application for registration has been falsified.  The owner
shall surrender to the division, within 15 days of suspension or revocation,
the suspended or revoked registration card and registration sticker.
